Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7428
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Wholesale Drug Distributor Licensing Act, the definitions found in sections 71-7429 to 71-7446 apply.

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-7402;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 2.